Massachusetts, session 194th, S428.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 69 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 1T the
following new section:-
Section 1U. School Library Standards
As used in this section, (i) the term “school library standards” means the most recent
edition of academic standards for school library media programs developed by the American
Association of School Librarians (AASL) and endorsed for the commonwealth by the
Massachusetts School Library Association (MSLA); (ii) the term “effective school library
program” means school library programs that are staffed by certified school librarians, offer
equitable access to a collection and other resources for all students, and provides personalized
learning environments for students within
of 2

instruction time and across the school day; (iii) the term “schools” means all public
schools, charter schools, private day schools, residential schools, and collaborative schools
established and recognized under this Title.
Pursuant to the provisions of section 1D, the department shall adopt AASL and MSLA
school library standards that promote effective school library programs, including, but not
limited to: (a) a well-rounded grade-appropriate collection that supports the curriculum as well as
independent reading and inquiry; (b) the teaching of information literacy and research skills for
students in kindergarten to grade 12; (c) furthers reading proficiency and competencies for all
students; and (d) integrates learning technologies across the curriculum. Pursuant to the
provisions of section 1E, the commissioner shall guide school committees or boards of trustees
in implementation of standards and the development of effective school library programs. School
committees or board of trustees may incorporate the school library standards into existing
curricula including, but not limited to, English language arts, history and social sciences, and
technology.
The department shall require a study by the department relative to the implementation of
the school library standards beginning in the third year after the enactment of said standards.
Subject to appropriation, the department shall conduct a study in each third year following the
initial study, including a study of employment of school librarians and staff and the type of
school library programs being offered in schools to students. The study shall include a report to
the public via department communication platforms on best practices and recommended
improvements to effective school library programs for all students.
of 2